California statutes. Education Code
(d) The Superintendent and the commission shall identify effective practices and techniques and provide for the dissemination of these to local induction program providers.

(e) Immediately following the adoption of revised standards pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall review induction programs to determine whether local teacher induction programs are meeting standards of quality and effectiveness adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) and to assure greater program quality and consistency. The commission shall schedule regular reviews following the initial review of programs pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) The Superintendent and the commission shall ensure that teacher credential candidates are notified of the opportunity to choose an early completion option pursuant to Section 44468.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated in Provision 44 of Item 6110-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2006 (Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2006) be made available for reviews and preparation of the reports required pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), and that the implementation of recommendations proceed immediately following the adoption of those reviews and reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 517, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

44279.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the executive secretary of the commission and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall recommend to the commission standards of beginning teachers’ support and performance, and an assessment process for verifying attainment of the performance standards, which shall be based on the results of the evaluation study required by Section 44279.2, as that section read on December 31, 1992.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission shall adopt and promulgate standards and requirements for earning the professional teaching credential pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 44225 in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The proposed regulations shall be developed jointly with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and shall be drafted in consultation with the panel established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44259.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 44225 be operative within six months of the commission’s adoption of standards and requirements for earning the professional credential. First priority shall be given to cost-effective requirements that maximize the use of existing state and local resources. The commission shall consider the use of credential fees and assessment fees to support the cost of implementing the requirements. In adopting professional teacher certification requirements pursuant to this subdivision, the commission shall include the criteria specified in subdivision (d) of Section 44225, and, in addition, shall include the following:

(1) A rigorous program of candidate-centered assessment that relies upon individually evaluating the fitness of each individual candidate for a credential.

(2) Rigorous assessments of each teaching candidate’s general knowledge and subject matter knowledge, that are designed to verify reading skills, writing ability, mathematical reasoning, and other elements of a liberal arts education. 

(3) Assessments of each teaching candidate’s instructional skills and classroom management skills, including an assessment of each teaching candidate’s ability to work effectively with students of both sexes and from a variety of ethnic, socioeconomic, cultural, academic, and linguistic backgrounds.

(4) Alternatives for professionally supervising, supporting, and assisting beginning teachers for at least the critical first full teaching year.

(5) Deregulation of the academic training of teachers by shifting the emphasis from granting credentials on the basis of program approval to granting credentials on the basis of comprehensive assessments of individual candidates.

(c) If the professional teacher certification requirements adopted by the commission include passage of a standardized examination, the commission shall establish a procedure for approval by the commission of alternative examinations or assessments whose scope, contents, and level of difficulty are determined by the commission to be equivalent to the scope, contents, and level of difficulty of the standardized examination. In making these determinations, the commission may refer to and utilize, to the extent consistent with this section, accepted national and professional standards governing the use of tests and assessments, and governing the determination of equivalence between alternative tests and assessments. The commission shall recover the costs of administering any standard examination that the commission adopts by collecting examination fees from examinees. An agency or organization that recommends an alternative examination that is approved by the commission shall pay the costs of developing and administering the alternative examination from any available source of funds, including examination fees, existing budget allocations, and amended budget allocations.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that no detailed prescriptive checklists of competencies be adopted at the state level for the assessment of each beginning teacher’s classroom performance.

(e) Until the operative date of the regulations that are adopted and promulgated in accordance with subdivision (b), the commission shall continue to administer teacher certification requirements and regulations that were in effect on December 31, 1988. The commission may amend those requirements and regulations, as the need arises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1245, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44279.4.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that one full year, or the equivalent thereof, of paid, classroom teaching experience and beginning teacher support and assessment shall be a prerequisite to obtaining a professional credential to teach in the California public schools.

(2) Any
 credential candidate who is eligible for a preliminary credential shall be eligible for a classroom teaching position with beginning teacher support and assessment. The requirements of this article may be waived by the commission for individuals who are pursuing alternative entry programs established pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 44225 and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 44259.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that support and assessment of beginning teachers shall be governed by standards adopted by the commission in consultation with the Superintendent and the state board.

(c) A beginning teacher who has been issued a preliminary teaching credential and a preliminary specialty credential pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44225 shall be eligible for one year of beginning teacher support and assessment that
 combines classroom teaching and specialty instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 348, Sec. 4.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

44279.7.

(a) The superintendent and the commission shall award supplemental grants on a competitive basis to Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System teacher induction programs established pursuant to Section 44279.2 that are identified as having expertise according to criteria established by the superintendent and the commission. The supplemental grants received pursuant to this section shall be expended to assist clusters of teacher induction programs operated by school districts or consortiums of school districts.

(b) The superintendent and the commission shall designate each school district and consortium of school districts participating in the Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System established pursuant to Section 44279.2 as belonging to a cluster according to the criteria established pursuant to this subdivision. For the purposes of this section “cluster” means a cluster of school districts or consortium of school districts established pursuant this section. The superintendent and the commission shall establish criteria for the formation of school districts or consortiums of school district teacher induction program clusters based upon, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Geographic proximity.

(2) Program size.

(3) The number of beginning teachers served.

(4) The similarity of teacher characteristics and pupil populations in each school district.

(c) School districts and consortiums of school districts awarded supplemental grants pursuant to this section shall identify a teacher induction program consultant to assist the school district or consortiums of school districts forming a cluster. The superintendent and the commission shall identify the purpose and functions of each consultant. Those purposes and functions shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all the following:

(1) Assisting in designing, implementing, refining, and evaluating their teacher induction programs.

(2) Assisting in building the capacity to provide professional development for all personnel involved in the implementation of teacher induction programs, including, but not limited to, beginning teachers, support providers, and administrators.

(3) Disseminating information on teacher induction programs to all interested participants within the cluster and collaborating with other consultants statewide and with state administrative agency staff to ensure ongoing program improvement.

(d) The superintendent and the commission shall ensure that each grant awarded pursuant to this section supports the salary and benefits and other related costs based on the prorated amount of time dedicated to this function for a consultant to assist each cluster.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Subject Matter Examinations and Assessments [44280. - 44298.]

44280.

(a) The adequacy of subject matter preparation and the basis for assignment of certified personnel shall be determined by the successful demonstration of subject matter competence as set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(b) For the purpose of determining the adequacy of subject matter knowledge of languages for which there are no adequate examinations, the commission may establish guidelines for accepting alternative assessments performed by organizations that are expert in the language and culture
 assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 40.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

44281.

(a) The commission and programs of professional preparation shall support teacher candidates to establish subject matter competence through a degree major or coursework, pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(b) The commission shall update the degree majors that establish subject matter competence pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 and ensure the subject matter requirements support streamlined transcript review, including for use by programs of professional preparation to review transcripts for their candidates seeking to establish subject matter competence through coursework.

(c) Where a candidate’s degree major or completed coursework do not establish their subject matter competence, the commission shall make subject matter examinations available. The commission shall maintain a standard error of measurement for the determination of passing scores for these examinations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 64.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44282.

(a) The commission shall adopt examinations and assessments to verify the subject matter knowledge and competence of candidates for the single subject teaching credentials described in Section 44257 and the concentrations described in Section 44257.2.

(b) A general subject matter examination authorizing teaching multiple subjects shall include an examination of the candidate’s knowledge of the following areas: language studies, literature, mathematics, science, social studies, history, the arts, physical education, and human development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 809, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44282.1.

(a) In carrying out its duties prescribed by subdivision (h) of Section 44225, the commission shall not develop a new health science subject matter examination, but shall instead employ an existing health science subject matter examination for the purpose of certifying single subject instruction in health science.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that no funds be appropriated from the Teacher Credentials Fund, or any other fund, for the purpose of development of a health science subject matter examination by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 604, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44283.

(a) The Legislature hereby recognizes that teacher competence in reading instruction is essential to the progress and achievement of pupils learning to read in elementary and secondary schools. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission develop a reading instruction competence assessment to measure the knowledge, skill, and ability of first-time credential applicants who are not credentialed in any state who will be responsible for reading instruction.

(b) The commission shall develop, adopt, and administer a reading instruction competence assessment consisting of one or more instruments to measure an individual’s knowledge, skill, and ability relative to effective reading instruction. The reading instruction competence assessment shall measure the
 knowledge, skill, and ability of first-time credential applicants who are not credentialed in any state that the commission determines to be essential to reading instruction and shall be consistent with the state’s reading curriculum framework adopted after July 1, 1996, and the Reading Program Advisory published by the department in 1996. The commission shall perform the following duties with respect to the reading instruction competence assessment:

(1) (A) Develop, adopt, and administer the assessment.

(B) The commission may also adopt an off-the-shelf assessment if it meets the requirements of this section.

(2) Initially and periodically analyze the validity and reliability of the content of the assessment.

(3) Establish and implement appropriate passing scores on the assessment.

(4) Analyze possible sources of bias on the assessment.

(5) Collect and analyze background information provided by first-time credential applicants who are not credentialed in any state who participate in the assessment.

(6) Report and interpret individual and aggregated assessment results.

(7) Convene a task force to advise the commission on the design, content, and administration of the assessment. Not less than one-third of the members of the task force
 shall be classroom teachers with recent experience in teaching reading in the early elementary grades.

(8) Before requiring successful passage of the assessment for the preliminary multiple subject teaching credential, certify that all of the teacher education programs approved by the commission pursuant to Section 44227 offer instruction in the knowledge, skills, and abilities required by the assessment.

(c) Until the commission ensures that an approved teaching performance assessment for a preliminary multiple subject credential, as required by Section 44320.2, and a preliminary education specialist credential assesses candidates for competence in instruction in literacy as specified in Section 44320.3, the requirements for issuance of the preliminary multiple subject teaching credential, as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 44259, or the preliminary education specialist
 credential shall include successful passage of one of the following components of the reading instruction competence assessment:

(1) A comprehensive examination of the knowledge and skill pertaining to effective reading instruction of the credential applicant.

(2) An authentic assessment of teaching skills and classroom abilities of the credential applicant pertaining to the provision of effective reading instruction.

(3) A combination of paragraphs (1) and (2), as approved by the commission.

(d) The reading instruction competence assessment is subject to the provisions of Sections 44235.1 and 44298.

(e) Credential candidates who have completed all program requirements, including passage of a teaching performance assessment, or preliminary credentialholders that are required to pass the reading instruction competence assessment in order to earn the clear credential, may have until October 31, 2025, to take and pass the reading instruction competence assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 33.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44283.1.

(a) As of the effective date of this section, an applicant for a preliminary multiple subject teaching credential or a preliminary education specialist instruction credential will hold a passing reading instruction competence assessment score prospectively if, within the 10 calendar years following the date the score was earned, the applicant has achieved a reading instruction competence assessment examination score as follows:

(1) A score of 198 earned on the 2009 single administration reading instruction competence assessment examination before July 26, 2021.

(2) A score of 198 earned on each subtest of the three-subtest version of the reading instruction competence
 assessment on or after July 26, 2021.

(b) This section supersedes subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 80071 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 34.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44283.2.

(a) Commencing on January 1, 2000, prior to the initial issuance of a specialist teaching credential in special education pursuant to Section 44265, except as provided in subdivision (b) a first time credential applicant who is not credentialed in any state shall be required to demonstrate that he or she passed the reading instruction competence assessment developed pursuant to Section 44283.

(b) This section shall not apply to an applicant for an Early Childhood Special Education Certificate or Early Childhood Special Education Credential, which authorizes the holder to provide educational services to children from birth through prekindergarten who are eligible for early intervention special education and related services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

44283.3.

A holder of a preliminary multiple subject credential or a preliminary education specialist credential who was unable to take the reading instruction competence assessment pursuant to Section 44283, as it read on January 1, 2020, due to the closure of assessment centers during the COVID-19 pandemic, and who must complete this requirement in order to earn a professional clear credential, may, if the reading instruction competence assessment is no longer being administered, complete this requirement through successful completion of an assessment required by another state that is identified by the commission as meeting the requirements of Section 44283, as it read on January 1, 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44284.

Examinations authorizing advanced or specialist teaching service may be authorized by the commission. Such examinations shall conform to the guidelines established by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44288.

The commission shall create subject matter advisory panels to advise in the selection, administration, and interpretation of examinations. The subject matter advisory panels shall consist of recognized leaders in the subject matter fields to be examined and shall be composed primarily of full-time public school classroom teachers, and full-time college or university classroom teachers.

Experts and authorities in the field of examination design, interpretation, and analysis may be included in the subject matter panels or may be separately employed by the commission.

Members of the examination panels shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses.

The approved examinations shall provide for flexibility and variety in patterns of subject matter preparation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44289.

The commission shall set passing scores with the objective of assuring an adequate level of subject matter preparation.

The examination shall report at least relative and absolute scores to facilitate comparison and interpretation, if practicable.

The individual candidate’s score on any examination shall be a matter of record, but shall not be posted on the front of the credential or be made available to the public; the teaching or other credential shall identify by name those examinations successfully passed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit research, evaluation, analysis, or interpretation of test scores so long as individual confidentiality is maintained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44290.

The commission, before the adoption of any examination, shall provide an opportunity to the public and teaching profession to present their viewpoints with respect thereto in open hearings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44291.

The approved examinations shall be instruments whose purpose is to measure achievement and shall be used solely to measure objective knowledge of subject matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44292.

Insofar as is reasonable and practicable, the commission shall adopt examinations which are nationally administered on a regular basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44293.

In selecting subject matter examinations, the commission shall consider the importance of timely and expeditious processing and the desirability and convenience of machine scoring.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44294.

The commission may approve more than one examination with passing scores appropriate to each examination for any of the categories to be examined as required by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44295.

In the selection, adoption and interpretation of examinations, the commission shall analyze and account for any cultural, class, or social bias which may arbitrarily and unfairly work to the disadvantage of any group of examinees, and shall assess and report upon the extent to which, if any, the passing score may adversely affect any group of prospective or actual examinees due to social, cultural, or ethnic factors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44296.

The commission may collect various data, including the ethnic background of examinees, age, sex, the college or university attended, degrees held, teaching experience, and other factors which may pertain, in the judgment of the commission, to examination performance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44297.

No limit may be placed on the number of times an examinee may take the approved examinations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44298.

Fees charged for the examinations shall be sufficient to furnish the full cost of the examination system, except as these funds may be augmented from designated appropriations by the Legislature from the Teacher Credentials Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Emergency Permits [44300. - 44302.]

44300.

(a) Commencing January 1, 1990, the commission may issue or renew emergency teaching or specialist permits in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission corresponding to the credential types specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44225, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant possesses a baccalaureate degree conferred by a regionally accredited institution of higher education and has fulfilled the subject matter requirements of Section 44301.

(2) The commission approves the justification for the emergency permit submitted by the school district in which the applicant is to be employed. The justification
 shall include all of the following:

(A) Annual documentation that the district has implemented in policy and practices a process for conducting a diligent search that shall include, but is not limited to, distributing job announcements, contacting college and university placement centers, advertising in local newspapers, and participating in job fairs in this state, but has been unable to recruit a sufficient number of certificated teachers, including teacher candidates pursuing full certification through internship, district internship, or other alternative routes established by the commission.

(B) A declaration of need for fully qualified educators based on the documentation set forth in subparagraph (A) and made in the form of a motion adopted by the governing board of the school district or the county board of education at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board
 or the county board of education. The motion may not be part of the consent agenda and shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting.

(b) The commission may deny a request for an emergency permit that does not meet the justification set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission continue to issue emergency teaching permits to individuals employed by school districts defined in regulations as remote from regionally accredited institutions of higher education.

(d) The commission may issue and reissue emergency permits corresponding to the credential types specified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44225. The commission shall establish appropriate standards for each type of emergency permit specified in
 subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44225.

(e) The exclusive representative of certificated employees, if any, as provided under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, may submit a written statement to the commission agreeing or disagreeing with the justification submitted to the commission pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(f) A person holding an emergency teaching or specialist permit shall attend an orientation to the curriculum and to techniques of instruction and classroom management, and shall teach only with the assistance and guidance of a certificated employee of the district who has completed at least three years of full-time teaching experience, or the equivalent thereof. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage districts to provide directed teaching experience to new
 emergency permitholders with no prior teaching experience.

(g) The holder of an emergency permit shall participate in ongoing training, coursework, or seminars designed to prepare the individual to become a fully credentialed teacher or other educator in the subject area or areas in which the individual is assigned to teach or serve. The employing agency shall verify that employees applying to renew their emergency permits are meeting these ongoing training requirements.

(h) Emergency permits for pupil personnel services shall not be valid for the purpose of determining pupil eligibility for placement in a special education class or program.

(i) This section shall not apply to the issuance of an emergency substitute teaching permit, or of an emergency permit to a teacher who has consented to teach temporarily outside
 of their field of certification, for which the commission shall establish minimum requirements.

(j) The commission may issue a one-year emergency specialist teaching permit in early childhood education that authorizes teaching all subjects in a self-contained transitional kindergarten general education classroom, as defined in Section 48000, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant possesses a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a regionally accredited institution of higher education and holds a valid commission-issued child development permit at the teacher or higher level.

(2) The applicant satisfies the subject matter requirement by one of the following options:

(A) Commencing July 1, 2022, completes 24
 semester units of coursework in child development or early childhood education at a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(B) Commencing July 1, 2022, holds a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a regionally accredited institution of higher education where the major is in child development, or early childhood education, or a similar major.

(C) Commencing July 1, 2023, has three or more years of full-time teaching experience in a transitional kindergarten setting, or preschool age early childhood or child development program, or a combination thereof. Experience may include, but shall not be limited to, teaching experience in a public or private preschool or transitional kindergarten setting, Head Start program, or state-funded preschool program. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “teaching” shall mean the lead or primary classroom teacher, and not
 teaching done in support of another lead or primary classroom teacher.

(3) The commission approves the justification for the emergency permit submitted by the local employing agency in which the applicant is to be employed. The justification shall include all of the following:

(A) Annual documentation that the local employing agency has implemented in policy and practices a process for conducting a diligent search that shall include, but is not limited to, distributing job announcements, contacting college and university placement centers, advertising in local newspapers or online webpages, and participating in job fairs in this state, but has been unable to recruit a sufficient number of certificated teachers, including teacher candidates pursuing full certification through internship, district internship, or other alternative routes established by the commission.

(B) A declaration of need for fully qualified educators based on the documentation set forth in subparagraph (A) and made in the form of a motion adopted by the governing body of the charter school, the governing board of the school district, or the county board of education at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body or board or the county board of education. The motion may not be part of the consent agenda and shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting.

(C) (i) Verification that the employing charter school, school district, or county shall provide the required orientation, mentoring, and support to the applicant.

(ii) The local employing agency shall report to the governing body of the charter school, the governing board of the school district, or the county board of education at
 a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body or board or the county board of education on the required orientation, mentoring and support provided to the applicants.

(k) The commission may renew an emergency specialist teaching permit in early childhood education for one additional year, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant verifies current enrollment in a commission-approved teacher preparation program that will result in a credential authorizing teaching transitional kindergarten.

(2) The local employing agency submits a subsequent declaration of need for fully qualified educators based on the documentation set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) made in the form of a motion adopted by the governing body of the charter school, the governing body of the
 school district, or the county board of education at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body or board or the county board of education. The motion may not be part of the consent agenda and shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting.

(3) The local employing agency verifies that the applicant continues to successfully serve in the assignment on the basis of the emergency permit.

(4) (A) The local employing agency verifies that continued orientation, mentoring, and support shall be provided to the applicant.

(B) The local employing agency shall report to the governing body of the charter school, the governing board of the school district, or the county board of education at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body or board or the county board of education on the required
 orientation, mentoring, and support provided to the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 36.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44300.5.

As an alternative to the employment verification required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 80025.1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations for the initial issuance of an emergency career substitute teaching permit, the commission shall accept verification by an employer or employers of, in the three years immediately preceding the date of application, at least 90 days per year of day-to-day substitute teaching accumulated from one or more California school districts participating in a consortium with the school district requesting the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   (AB 1876)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44301.

(a) A person who does not hold a valid California teaching credential that requires a baccalaureate degree shall be required to pass the appropriate subject matter competency examination or examinations, as determined by the commission, before that person may be initially issued an emergency multiple or single subject teaching permit, except an emergency substitute teaching permit, authorizing that person to teach a subject that is specified by the commission.

(b) The commission may issue an emergency multiple or single subject teaching permit to an applicant who has not taken the appropriate subject matter competency test, provided the employing agency certifies all of the following to the commission:

(1) The applicant has not had the opportunity to take the test.

(2) The applicant shall take the appropriate subject matter competency test at its next regularly scheduled administration.

(3) The employing agency shall discontinue employment of the person eight weeks after the date on which the test is administered if that person does not give the employing agency evidence of having passed the required subject matter competency test on that date.

(c) The emergency teaching permit issued pursuant to subdivision (b) shall expire on the next regular expiration date for emergency permits, or on a date that is eight weeks after the date on which the required subject matter competency test was administered, whichever date comes first.

(d) The commission shall waive the requirements of this section for each applicant for each of the following:

(1) An emergency single subject teaching permit, if the applicant has successfully completed at least 18 semester units, or nine semester units of upper division or graduate coursework, at a regionally accredited institution of higher education, in the subject area to be taught.

(2) An emergency multiple subjects permit, if the applicant has successfully completed at least 40 semester units, or the equivalent, at a regionally accredited institution of higher education, in the subjects that are commonly taught in elementary schools, as determined by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 22.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44302.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing regularly shall notify local educational agencies of the various provisions in current law that allow the assignment of personnel when a fully qualified teacher is not available and a substitute has served for the maximum days permitted by law, including emergency permits under Section 44300, long-term and short-term waivers under subdivision (m) of Section 44225, and intern permits under Sections 44235, 44250, and 44464. When fulfilling the notification requirements of this section, the commission shall utilize a variety of approaches, including, but not limited to, correspondence, annual workshops for credential analysts, a credential handbook, a waiver handbook, the commission website, and special telephone, fax, and e-mail lines for school districts and county offices of education. Additionally, the commission shall provide local educational agencies with information about waiver requests including specific timelines, key steps, and appeal rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Subject Matter Preparation [44310. - 44314.]

44310.

(a) The commission shall waive the subject matter examination requirement for graduates of a regionally accredited institution of higher education who successfully do any of the following:

(1) Complete a subject matter program approved by the commission on the basis of standards of program quality and effectiveness pursuant to this article.

(2) (A) Complete coursework at one or more regionally accredited institutions of higher education that addresses each of the domains of the subject matter requirements adopted by the commission in the content area of the credential pursuant to Section 44282.

(B) A program of
 professional preparation shall have the authority to review transcripts supplied by a candidate and confirm that each domain’s broad content area has been addressed.

(3) Address each of the broad content areas of the domains of the subject matter requirements adopted by the commission in the content area of the credential being sought through a combination of examination subtests and coursework described in paragraph (2).

(b) The commission shall encourage through its accreditation system that programs of professional preparation provide candidates equitable access to all of the options in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 for meeting subject matter competence.
